Illinois, session 104th, HB1513.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hazardous Materials Emergency Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 50/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1251)7    Sec. 1. It is the finding of the General Assembly: 8    (a) That That the use, transportation, storage and 9manufacture of hazardous materials creates a substantial risk 10that accidents will occur involving such hazardous materials;11    (b) That accidents involving hazardous materials create an 12unreasonable risk to the health, safety and welfare of the 13People of Illinois;14    (c) That the federal government promulgates regulations 15for the interstate transportation of hazardous materials, but 16that the People of Illinois can benefit by having such 17precautions as those included in federal regulation extended 18to intrastate transportation and other activities which might 19result in an accident involving hazardous materials;20    (d) That often the emergency agency which first responds 21to an accident involving a hazardous material is unable to 22determine the nature of the material and is unfamiliar with 23precautionary measures which must be exercised in handling the   HB1513- 2 -LRB104 08689 BDA 18743 b1material, with resulting use of incorrect emergency procedures 2endangering both members of the emergency agency and the 3public; and4    (e) That response to hazardous materials emergencies can 5be accomplished more rapidly and with greater efficiency if 6one agency of State government with the necessary 7communications network is designated as the central reporting 8agency in case of emergency.9(Source: P.A. 79-1442.)